Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6616YH (4) 91 ss/ko H.F. 2454 Section 1. Section 154D.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 154D.7 Temporary license ââ marital and family therapy ââ 3 mental health counseling ââ fees. 4 1. Any person who has fulfilled all of the requirements for 5 licensure under section 154D.2 , except for having completed 6 the postgraduate supervised clinical experience requirement as 7 determined by the board by rule, may apply to the board for a 8 temporary license. The license shall be designated âtemporary 9 license in marital and family therapyâ or âtemporary license in 10 mental health counselingâ and shall authorize the licensee to 11 practice marital and family therapy or mental health counseling 12 under the supervision of a qualified supervisor as determined 13 by the board by rule. The 14 2. A temporary licensed mental health counselor may be 15 employed by a school district, accredited nonpublic school, 16 charter school, or innovation zone school to practice mental 17 health counseling under the supervision of a qualified 18 supervisor as determined by the board by rule. 19 3. A temporary license shall be valid for three years and 20 may be renewed at the discretion of the board. The fee for 21 a temporary license shall be set by the board to cover the 22 administrative costs of issuing the license, and if renewed, a 23 renewal fee as set by the board shall be required. 24 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 280.37 Mental health counselors ââ 25 qualifications. 26 A school district, accredited nonpublic school, charter 27 school, or innovation zone school may employ a person with a 28 temporary license in mental health counseling issued pursuant 29 to section 154D.7 to provide mental health counseling services 30 to students. 31